Mississippi, session 2026, SB2223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-19-83, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-83.  Every person convicted in this state of a felony who shall have been convicted twice previously of any felony or federal crime upon charges separately brought and arising out of separate incidents at different times and who shall have been sentenced to and served separate terms of one (1) year or more, whether served concurrently or not, in any state * * * and/ or federal penal institution, whether in this state or elsewhere, and where * * * any one (1) both of such felonies shall have been a crime of violence, as defined by Section 97-3-2, shall be sentenced to life imprisonment, and such sentence shall not be reduced or suspended nor shall such person be eligible for parole, probation or any other form of early release from actual physical custody within the Department of Corrections. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.